Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5156.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 606c. (1) A local law enforcement agency may, by means of police officers or temporary traffic control devices, temporarily guide, direct, control, or stop traffic on a highway or street within the geographic jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency if necessary for public safety because of an emergency or event, including, but not limited to, either of the following: (a) A large-scale march, parade, or protest. (b) A terrorist attack or other violent act. (2) Subsection (1) applies to any state or local highway or street within the geographic jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency. (3) As used in this section, "local law enforcement agency" means a county sheriff's office or a police department of a city, village, or township.